src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_KIRVOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back v~po
!!€  kirvota: kirvota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # loose
0:vot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:vot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:vot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:von  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vo  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:vot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KADOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back d~t 
!!€  kadota: kadota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # disappear
0:dot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:don  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:do  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TODETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back t~de
!!€  todeta: todeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # note
0:det  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tea  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tea  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tea  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:tes  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tes  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tea  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:den  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tea  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_VYYHDETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 front t~de
!!€  vyyhdetä: vyyhdetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # entangle
0:det  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:teä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:teä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:teä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tes  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tes  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:teä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:den  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:teä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LIIDUTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back d~tu
!!€  liiduta: liiduta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # chalk
0:dut  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:dut  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:tus  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tus  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:dut  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:dun  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:du  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tua  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TUNGETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back g~ke
!!€  tungeta: tungeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # push
0:get  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:get  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:kes  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kes  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:get  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:gen  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ge  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:get  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:get  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PINGOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back g~ko
!!€  pingota: pingota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # ping
0:got  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:got  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:kos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:got  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:gon  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:go  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:got  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:got  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:koa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ÄNGETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 front g~ke 
!!€  ängetä: ängetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # push
0:get  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:get  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:kes  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kes  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:get  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:gen  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ge  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:get  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:get  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KUMMUTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back m~p 
!!€  kummuta: kummuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:mut  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:mut  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pus  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pus  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:mut  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:mun  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:mu  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:mut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:mut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pua  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KAMMETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back p~mu
!!€  kammeta: kammeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # lever
0:met  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:met  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pes  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pes  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:met  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:men  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:me  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:met  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:met  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pea  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SAMMOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back p~mu
!!€  sammota: sammota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:mot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:mot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:pos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:mot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:mon  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:mo  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:mot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:mot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:poa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_INNOTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back t~no
!!€  innota: innota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # eager
0:not  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:not  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:not  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:non  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:no  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:not  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:not  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_IRROTA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back t~to
!!€  irrota: irrota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # tear
0:rot  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:rot  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:tos  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:rot  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ron  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ro  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:rot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:rot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:toa  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HALJETA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 back j~ke
!!€  haljeta: haljeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # split
0:jet  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:kes  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kes  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:jen  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:jet  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kea  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ILJETÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 74 front j~k 
!!€  iljetä: iljetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # dare
0:jet  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:jet  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:kes  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:kes  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:jet  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:jen  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:je  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:jet  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:jet  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:keä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
