src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
haljeta+V:hal  VERB_HALJETA  ;
hangota+V:han  VERB_PINGOTA  ;
herjetä+V:her  VERB_ILJETÄ  ;
hervota+V:her  VERB_KIRVOTA  ;
iljetä+V:il  VERB_ILJETÄ  ;
innota+V:in  VERB_INNOTA  ;
irrota+V:ir  VERB_IRROTA  ;
juljeta+V:jul  VERB_HALJETA  ;
kadota+V:ka  VERB_KADOTA  ;
kammeta+V:kam  VERB_KAMMETA  ;
kangeta+V:kan  VERB_TUNGETA  ;
kehjetä+V:keh  VERB_ILJETÄ  ;
kerjetä+V:ker  VERB_ILJETÄ  ;
kimmota+V:kim  VERB_SAMMOTA  ;
kirvota+V:kir  VERB_KIRVOTA  ;
kummuta+V:kum  VERB_KUMMUTA  ;
langeta+V:lan  VERB_TUNGETA  ;
liiduta+V:lii  VERB_LIIDUTA  ;
lingota+V:lin  VERB_PINGOTA  ;
lohjeta+V:loh  VERB_HALJETA  ;
padota+V:pa  VERB_KADOTA  ;
pingota+V:pin  VERB_PINGOTA  ;
pudota+V:pu  VERB_KADOTA  ;
puhjeta+V:puh  VERB_HALJETA  ;
sammota+V:sam  VERB_SAMMOTA  ;
seljetä+V:sel  VERB_ILJETÄ  ;
singota+V:sin  VERB_PINGOTA  ;
teljetä+V:tel  VERB_ILJETÄ  ;
todeta+V:to  VERB_TODETA  ;
tungeta+V:tun  VERB_TUNGETA  ;
turvota+V:tur  VERB_KIRVOTA  ;
vaahdota+V:vaah  VERB_KADOTA  ;
varrota+V:var  VERB_IRROTA  ;
vedota+V:ve  VERB_KADOTA  ;
vyyhdetä+V:vyyh  VERB_VYYHDETÄ  ;
ängetä+V:än  VERB_ÄNGETÄ  ;
